Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.190

Inspection of licensed premises and records—Certificate of inspection.

The chiefs of police, the county sheriffs, and the Washington state patrol may make periodic inspection of the licensee's licensed premises and records provided for in this chapter during normal business hours, and furnish a certificate of inspection to the department of licensing in such manner as may be determined by the department. In any instance, an authorized representative of the department may make the inspection. Licensees are subject to unannounced periodic inspections, as described in this section.

[ 2013 c 322 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.